Utah statutes.
31A-30-205.   Health benefit plans offered in the defined contribution
market.
(1)  An insurer who chooses to offer a health benefit plan in the defined
contribution market must offer the following:
(a)  one health benefit plan that:
(i)  is a federally qualified high deductible health plan;
(ii)  has the lowest deductible permitted for a federally qualified high
deductible health plan as adjusted by federal law; and
(iii)  does not exceed annual out-of-pocket maximum equal to three times the
amount of the annual deductible; and
(b)  one health benefit plan with benefits that have an actuarial value at
least 15% greater that the plan described in Subsection (1)(a).
(2)  The provisions of Subsection (1) do not limit the number of health
benefit plans an insurer may offer in the defined contribution market.  An
insurer who offers the health benefit plans required by Subsection (1) may
also offer any other health benefit plan in the defined contribution market if
the health benefit plan provides benefits that are actuarially richer than the
benefits required in Subsection (1)(a).
